ja: 使用可能な哺乳瓶の種類: スタンダード; ワイドネック; その他
ko: 호환 가능한 젖병 디자인: 표준; 와이드 넥; 기타
de: Kompatibles Babyflaschendesign: Standard; Weiter Hals; Sonstiges
hu: Kompatibilis cumisüveg kialakítása: Normál; Széles nyakú; Egyéb
sl-SI: Združljiva zasnova stekleničke za dojenčke: Standardna; Široko ustje; Drugo
pl: Pasująca forma butelki dla niemowląt: Standard; Szeroki dekolt; Inne
es: Diseño de biberón compatible: Estándar; Cuello ancho; Otros
nb: Kompatibel utforming på babyflaske: Standard; Bred hals; Annet
pt-BR: Formato da mamadeira compatível: Padrão; Gola larga; Outro
ro-RO: Design biberon compatibil: Standard; Gât larg; Altele
nl: Compatibel ontwerp babyfles: Standaard; Brede hals; Andere
en: Compatible baby bottle design: Standard; Wide-neck; Other
fi: Yhteensopivan tuttipullon muotoilu: Tavallinen; Leveä kaula-aukkoinen; Muu
pt-PT: Desenho de biberão compatível: Padrão; Gargalo largo; Outro
ru: Совместимые типы детских бутылочек: Стандартный; Широкая горловина; Другое
lt-LT: Suderinamas buteliuko kūdikiams dizainas: Standartinis; Platus kaklelis; Kita
zh-TW: 相容嬰兒奶瓶設計: 標準; 寬口式; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместим дизайн на бебешко шише: Стандартна; Широк отвор; Други
zh-CN: 适用婴儿奶瓶设计: 标准; 宽领; 其他
cs: Vhodný tvar kojenecké láhve: Standardní; Se širokým hrdlem; Jiné
vi: Thiết kế bình sữa tương thích: Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Cổ rộng; Khác
sk-SK: Kompatibilný dizajn dojčenskej fľaše: Štandardný; Široký výstrih; Iné
sv: Kompatibel nappflasksdesign: Standard; Vid hals; Övrigt
it: Modello di biberon compatibile: Standard; A collo ampio; Altro
th: การออกแบบขวดนมที่เข้ากันได้: มาตรฐาน; คอกว้าง; อื่นๆ
fr: Modèle de biberon compatible: Standard; Col large; Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilan dizajn bočice za bebe: Standardni; Širokog vrata; Ostalo
el: Συμβατό σχέδιο μπιμπερό: Κανονικό; Με φαρδύ στόμιο; Άλλο
tr: Uyumlu biberon tasarımı: Standart; Geniş boyunlu; Diğer
da: Kompatibelt sutteflaskedesign: Standard; Bred hals; Andet